Utah statutes.
7-5-6.   Confidentiality of communications and writings concerning trust --
Actions to protect property or authorized under probate laws not precluded.
Any trust company exercising the powers and performing the duties described in
this chapter shall keep inviolate all communications and writings made to or
by that trust company relating to the existence, condition, management or
administration of any agency or fiduciary account confided to it and no
creditor or stockholder of any such trust company shall be entitled to
disclosure or knowledge of any such communication or writing, except that the
directors, president, vice president, manager, treasurer, and trust officers,
and any employees assigned to work on the trust business, and the attorney or
auditor employed by it shall be entitled to knowledge of any such
communication or writing and except that in any suit or proceeding relating to
the existence, condition, management or administration of the account, the
court in which the suit is pending may require disclosure of any such
communication or writing. A trust company is not, however, precluded from
filing an action in court to protect trust account property or as authorized
under Title 75.
